Utah statutes.
38-1a-706.   Apportionment of costs -- Costs and attorney fees to subcontractor.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 38-11-107, the court shall apportion costs between the owner and original contractor according to the right of the case.

(2)  The court shall award a subcontractor with a valid preconstruction or construction lien:

(a)  all of the subcontractor's costs, including the costs of preparing and recording the notice of preconstruction or construction lien; and

(b)  the subcontractor's reasonable attorney fees incurred in preparing and recording the notice of preconstruction or construction lien.

